Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1006.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1203, add (2.5)
as follows:
10-16-1203. Definitions. As used in this part 12, unless the context
otherwise requires:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(2.5) "ENHANCED PREMIUM TAX CREDIT" MEANS THE PREMIUM TAX
CREDIT, AS AMENDED BY THE FEDERAL "AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN ACT OF
2021", PUB.L. 117-2, AND THE FEDERAL "INFLATION REDUCTION ACT OF
2022", PUB.L. 117-169, 136 STAT. 1818 (2022), WHICH EXPANDED
ELIGIBILITY FOR AND THE AMOUNT OF THE PREMIUM TAX CREDIT.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1205, amend
(2)(d)(I) introductory portion; and add (2)(d)(IV) and (2)(e) as follows:
10-16-1205. Health insurance affordability fees - special
assessment on hospitals - allocation of revenues. (2) (d) (I) EXCEPT AS
PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (2)(d)(IV) AND (2)(e) OF THIS SECTION, the
enterprise shall allocate the revenues collected in 2023 and each year
thereafter, and any other money deposited in the fund in 2023 and each year
thereafter, in the following amounts and order of priority:
(IV) ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION
(2)(d)(IV), THE ENTERPRISE SHALL REALLOCATE ANY AMOUNT OF REVENUES
COLLECTED AND ALLOCATED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(d)(I) OF THIS
SECTION THAT HAVE NOT BEEN EXPENDED ON OR BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE
DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION (2)(d)(IV), NOT TO EXCEED TWENTY MILLION
DOLLARS, FOR ANY OTHER PURPOSE SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (2)(d)(I) OF
THIS SECTION EXCEPT ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION
(2)(d)(I)(A) OF THIS SECTION.
(e) (I) ON OR AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE STATE TREASURER
CREDITS MONEY TO THE FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 10-16-1206
(1.5)(a), EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (2)(e)(II) OF THIS SECTION,
THE ENTERPRISE SHALL ALLOCATE THE MONEY CREDITED TO THE FUND
PURSUANT TO SECTION 10-16-1206 (1.5)(a) AS FOLLOWS:
(A) UP TO FIFTY MILLION DOLLARS TO THE REINSURANCE PROGRAM
CASH FUND; AND
(B) UP TO FIFTY MILLION DOLLARS TO CARRIERS TO REDUCE THE
COSTS OF INDIVIDUAL HEALTH PLANS FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO PURCHASE AN
INDIVIDUAL HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN ON THE EXCHANGE AND RECEIVE THE
PREMIUM TAX CREDIT.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

(II) THE ENTERPRISE MAY ALLOCATE UP TO FIVE MILLION DOLLARS
OF THE MONEY CREDITED TO THE FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
10-16-1206 (1.5)(a) FOR ANY OTHER PURPOSE SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION
(2)(d)(I) OF THIS SECTION EXCEPT ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (2)(d)(I)(A) OF THIS SECTION.
(III) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(e) TAKES EFFECT ON JANUARY 1, 2026,
ONLY IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN SECTION 10-16-1209 (1) OCCURS.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1206, amend
(1)(g) and (1)(h); and add (1)(i) and (1.5) as follows:
10-16-1206. Health insurance affordability cash fund - creation.
(1) There is created in the state treasury the health insurance affordability
cash fund. The fund consists of:
(g) The federal share of the medical assistance payments received
pursuant to section 25.5-4-503 (2); and
(h) Gifts, grants, or donations received from private or public
sources; AND
(i) ANY OTHER MONEY THAT MAY BE APPROPRIATED OR
TRANSFERRED TO THE FUND.
(1.5) (a) THE FUND ALSO CONSISTS OF ONE HUNDRED MILLION
DOLLARS FROM THE FOLLOWING SOURCES, WHICH THE ENTERPRISE SHALL
ALLOCATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 10-16-1205 (2)(e):
(I) UP TO ONE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS FROM TAX CREDIT SALE
PROCEEDS CREDITED TO THE FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-36-406; AND
(II) (A) IF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS
AVAILABLE FOR DEPOSIT IN THE FUND IS LESS THAN ONE HUNDRED MILLION
DOLLARS, AN AMOUNT DETERMINED AND TRANSFERRED, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (1.5)(a)(II)(B) OF THIS SECTION, FROM THE GENERAL
FUND TO THE FUND;
(B) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL DETERMINE THE AMOUNT OF THE
TRANSFER FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE FUND BY CALCULATING THE
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

DIFFERENCE BETWEEN ONE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS AND THE AMOUNT
OF TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS CREDITED TO THE FUND PURSUANT TO
SECTION 24-36-406 AND, WITHIN TEN DAYS AFTER MAKING THE
DETERMINATION, SHALL TRANSFER THAT AMOUNT FROM THE GENERAL FUND
TO THE FUND.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (1.5) TAKES EFFECT ON JANUARY 1, 2026, ONLY
IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN SECTION 10-16-1209 (1) OCCURS.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1207, amend
(4)(c.5)(III); and add (4.5) and (7) as follows:
10-16-1207. Health insurance affordability board - creation -
membership - powers and duties - subject to open meetings and public
records laws - annual report - commissioner rules. (4) The board is
authorized to:
(c.5) Further recommend, for approval and establishment by the
commissioner by rule, additional parameters for implementing the subsidies
for state-subsidized individual health coverage plans authorized by this part
12, including that the coverage required pursuant to state-subsidized
individual health coverage plans must:
(III) For a person who, at the time the person applies for
state-subsidized coverage, meets the income requirements to qualify for
emergency medical assistance pursuant to section 25.5-5-103 and who is a
qualified individual who meets the eligibility criteria established in rule
pursuant to subsection (4)(c)(IV) of this section, include coverage AND
PLAN DESIGN that:
(A) Has no premium;
(B) (A) Has an actuarial value of not less than ninety-four percent
MAXIMIZES ENROLLMENT IN THE PLAN; and
(C) (B) To the extent possible with available funding, includes cost
sharing that is further reduced from subsection (4)(c.5)(III)(B) of this
section such that the plan has consumer cost-sharing responsibilities for
emergency services equivalent to cost-sharing responsibilities for
emergency medical assistance pursuant to section 25.5-5-103;
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

(4.5) PRIOR TO MAKING ANY FINAL RECOMMENDATION PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION REGARDING PLANS, COVERAGE, AND THE
NUMBER OF ELIGIBLE SLOTS, THE BOARD SHALL SEEK INPUT AND
RECOMMENDATIONS FROM INDIVIDUALS DIRECTLY AFFECTED BY PROGRAMS
FUNDED BY THE ENTERPRISE AND SHALL DISCUSS ANY INPUT AND
RECOMMENDATIONS RECEIVED AT A BOARD MEETING HELD IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION. THE BOARD SHALL PROVIDE
OPPORTUNITIES FOR INDIVIDUALS TO PROVIDE INPUT AND
RECOMMENDATIONS IN ENGLISH AND SPANISH.
(7) (a) BY FEBRUARY 15, 2026, AND BY EVERY FEBRUARY 15
THEREAFTER, THE BOARD SHALL PREPARE A REPORT DETAILING:
(I) THE TOTAL REVENUE RECEIVED BY THE ENTERPRISE IN THE
PREVIOUS CALENDAR YEAR;
(II) THE SHARE OF THE TOTAL REVENUE THAT WAS RECEIVED FROM
FEDERAL FUNDS;
(III) THE SHARE OF THE TOTAL REVENUE THAT WAS RECEIVED FROM
THE FEE;
(IV) IF ANY ADDITIONAL AMOUNT OF THE TOTAL REVENUE WAS
RECEIVED FROM ANY SOURCES OTHER THAN THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT OR
THE FEE, THE SPECIFIC SOURCE OF THOSE REVENUES AND THE SPECIFIC
AMOUNT OF REVENUES FOR EACH SOURCE;
(V) EACH SPECIFIC PROGRAM THAT RECEIVED FUNDING FROM THE
ENTERPRISE;
(VI) OF THE TOTAL ALLOCATION FOR EACH PROGRAM:
(A) THE SHARE OF THE TOTAL ALLOCATION THAT WAS FROM
FEDERAL FUNDING; AND
(B) THE SHARE OF THE TOTAL ALLOCATION THAT WAS FROM STATE
FUNDING AND THE SOURCE OF THAT STATE FUNDING;
(VII) FOR THE REINSURANCE PROGRAM, THE AMOUNT OF THE
ACTUAL ALLOCATION OF STATE MONEY TO THE REINSURANCE PROGRAM;
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

(VIII) IF LESS THAN THE MAXIMUM ALLOWABLE ALLOCATION OF
STATE MONEY IN THE FUND WAS ALLOCATED TO THE REINSURANCE
PROGRAM, AN EXPLANATION OF WHY THE REINSURANCE PROGRAM WAS NOT
FULLY FUNDED;
(IX) FOR ANY ALLOCATION THAT WAS MADE AT THE DISCRETION OF
THE BOARD OR COMMISSIONER AND NOT DEFINED EXPRESSLY IN STATUTE, AN
EXPLANATION OF THE ALLOCATIONS, THE AMOUNT OF EACH ALLOCATION,
THE RATIONALE FOR THE AMOUNTS, AND THE GOALS INTENDED TO BE
ACHIEVED AS A RESULT OF EACH ALLOCATION; AND
(X) THE AMOUNT OF SURPLUS IN THE FUND, IF ANY, AND AN
EXPLANATION OF WHY THE SURPLUS WAS NOT ALLOCATED TO ENTERPRISE
PROGRAMS.
(b) BY FEBRUARY 28, 2026, AND BY EACH FEBRUARY 28
THEREAFTER:
(I) THE BOARD SHALL SUBMIT THE REPORT TO THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE AND THE
SENATE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR
COMMITTEES, AND THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE; AND
(II) THE DIVISION SHALL POST THE REPORT ON THE DIVISION'S
PUBLIC-FACING WEBSITE IN AN EASILY ACCESSIBLE LOCATION AND MANNER.
(c) NOTWITHSTANDING THE REQUIREMENT IN SECTION 24-1-136
(11)(a)(I), THE REQUIREMENT TO SUBMIT THE REPORT SPECIFIED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (7) CONTINUES INDEFINITELY.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 10-16-1209,
10-16-1210, and 10-16-1211 as follows:
10-16-1209. Repeal of certain provisions - notice to the revisor
- repeal. (1) SECTIONS 10-16-1205 (2)(e), 10-16-1206 (1.5), AND
24-75-201.1 (1)(d)(XXVII)(A) WILL TAKE EFFECT ONLY IF, BY DECEMBER
31, 2025, THE UNITED STATES CONGRESS DOES NOT ENACT AND THE
PRESIDENT DOES NOT SIGN FEDERAL LEGISLATION THAT EXTENDS,
RECREATES, OR OTHERWISE REINSTATES THE ENHANCED PREMIUM TAX
CREDIT FOR THE 2026 PLAN YEAR. THE COMMISSIONER SHALL NOTIFY THE
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

REVISOR OF STATUTES IN WRITING IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (1) HAS OCCURRED BY EMAILING THE NOTICE TO
REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (1) OCCURS, SECTIONS 10-16-1205 (2)(e), 10-16-1206 (1.5),
AND 24-75-201.1 (1)(d)(XXVII)(A) TAKE EFFECT ON JANUARY 1, 2026.
(2) THIS SECTION AND SECTIONS 10-16-1205 (2)(e), 10-16-1206
(1.5), AND 24-75-201.1 (1)(d)(XXVII)(A) WILL BE REPEALED IF, ON OR
BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2025, THE UNITED STATES CONGRESS ENACTS AND
THE PRESIDENT SIGNS FEDERAL LEGISLATION THAT EXTENDS, RECREATES, OR
OTHERWISE REINSTATES THE ENHANCED PREMIUM TAX CREDIT FOR THE 2026
PLAN YEAR WITH AT LEAST THE SAME ELIGIBILITY AND IN THE SAME AMOUNT
AS AUTHORIZED BY THE AMENDMENTS TO THE PREMIUM TAX CREDIT IN THE
FEDERAL "AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN ACT OF 2021", PUB.L. 117-2, AND THE
FEDERAL "INFLATION REDUCTION ACT OF 2022", PUB.L. 117-169, 136 STAT.
1818 (2022). THE COMMISSIONER SHALL NOTIFY THE REVISOR OF STATUTES
IN WRITING IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION (2) HAS
OCCURRED AND OF THE DATE ON WHICH THE CONDITION OCCURRED BY
EMAILING THE NOTICE TO REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. THIS
SECTION AND SECTIONS 10-16-1205 (2)(e), 10-16-1206 (1.5), AND
24-75-201.1 (1)(d)(XXVII)(A) ARE REPEALED UPON THE DATE IDENTIFIED
IN THE NOTICE THAT THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION (2)
OCCURRED OR, IF THE NOTICE DOES NOT SPECIFY THAT DATE, UPON THE DATE
OF THE NOTICE TO THE REVISOR OF STATUTES.
10-16-1210. Regulatory agenda - division review of regulation
- repeal. (1) (a) THE DIVISION SHALL CONDUCT A REVIEW OF REGULATION
4-2-76, CONCERNING THE HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY FEE
ASSESSMENT AND COLLECTION PROCESS, CODIFIED IN 3 CCR 702-4, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-4-103.3. THE DEPARTMENT OF REGULATORY
AGENCIES SHALL INCLUDE THE DIVISION'S REVIEW OF REGULATION 4-2-76 IN
ITS DEPARTMENTAL REGULATORY AGENDA THAT THE DEPARTMENT SUBMITS
TO THE STAFF OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
2-7-203 (4) BY NOVEMBER 1, 2026. THE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
COMMITTEES OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND THE SENATE ARE THE
APPLICABLE COMMITTEES OF REFERENCE TO WHICH THE STAFF OF THE
LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE REVIEW OF REGULATION
4-2-76.
(b) THE DIVISION SHALL MAKE A PRESENTATION OF ITS REVIEW, AS
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

PART OF THE DEPARTMENTAL PRESENTATIONS TO THE COMMITTEES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 2-7-203, IN THE 2027 REGULAR LEGISLATIVE
SESSION.
(2) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
10-16-1211. Performance audit of the enterprise - repeal. (1) BY
DECEMBER 31, 2027, THE STATE AUDITOR SHALL COMPLETE A
PERFORMANCE AUDIT OF THE ENTERPRISE. IN CONDUCTING THE AUDIT, THE
STATE AUDITOR SHALL:
(a) DETERMINE WHETHER THE ENTERPRISE AND THE BOARD ARE IN
COMPLIANCE WITH THE PURPOSE AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE ENTERPRISE
AND THE BOARD AS SPECIFIED IN SECTIONS 10-16-1202, 10-16-1204,
10-16-1205, AND 10-16-1207;
(b) SPECIFY, FOR EACH YEAR SINCE THE CREATION OF THE
ENTERPRISE:
(I) THE ANNUAL REVENUE DEPOSITED IN THE FUND FROM:
(A) THE FEE COLLECTED FROM CARRIERS PURSUANT TO SECTION
10-16-1205 (1)(a)(I);
(B) THE SPECIAL ASSESSMENTS COLLECTED FROM HOSPITALS
PURSUANT TO SECTION 10-16-1205 (1)(a)(II);
(C) PREMIUM TAX REVENUES DEPOSITED IN THE FUND PURSUANT TO
SECTION 10-3-209 (4)(a)(III) BEFORE ITS REPEAL ON JULY 1, 2025;
(D) MONEY ALLOCATED TO THE FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION
10-16-1308;
(E) THE FEDERAL SHARE OF THE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS
RECEIVED PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-4-503 (2);
(F) ANY REVENUE COLLECTED FROM REVENUE BONDS PURSUANT TO
SECTION 10-16-1204 (1)(b)(II);
(G) INTEREST AND INCOME DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE FUND; AND
(H) ANY GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS RECEIVED FROM PRIVATE OR
PUBLIC SOURCES;
(II) THE ANNUAL EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND FOR THE PURPOSES
SPECIFIED IN SECTION 10-16-1205 (1)(b), INDICATING THE AMOUNTS
EXPENDED IN EACH YEAR FOR EACH OF THE FOLLOWING PURPOSES AND THE
AMOUNT OF SUCH EXPENDITURES THAT WAS PAID FROM REVENUES
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTIONS (1)(b)(I)(D) AND (1)(b)(I)(E) OF THIS SECTION:
(A) TO PROVIDE FUNDING FOR THE REINSURANCE PROGRAM;
(B) TO PROVIDE PAYMENTS TO CARRIERS TO INCREASE THE
AFFORDABILITY OF HEALTH INSURANCE ON THE INDIVIDUAL MARKET FOR
COLORADANS WHO RECEIVE THE PREMIUM TAX CREDIT;
(C) TO PROVIDE SUBSIDIES FOR STATE-SUBSIDIZED INDIVIDUAL
HEALTH COVERAGE PLANS PURCHASED BY QUALIFIED INDIVIDUALS;
(D) TO PAY THE ENTERPRISE'S ACTUAL ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS TO
IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THIS PART 12; AND
(E) TO PAY THE COSTS OF CONSUMER ENROLLMENT, OUTREACH, AND
EDUCATION ACTIVITIES REGARDING HEALTH-CARE COVERAGE; AND
(III) THE AMOUNT OF REVENUES ALLOCATED OR OTHERWISE
DESIGNATED FOR A PURPOSE SPECIFIED IN SECTION 10-16-1205 (1)(b) THAT
THE ENTERPRISE DID NOT ENCUMBER OR EXPEND;
(c) WITH REGARD TO THE ALLOCATION OF REVENUES TO THE
REINSURANCE PROGRAM:
(I) DETERMINE, FOR EACH YEAR SINCE THE ENTERPRISE COLLECTED
OR RECEIVED REVENUES, WHETHER THE ENTERPRISE ALLOCATED TO THE
REINSURANCE PROGRAM CASH FUND THE MAXIMUM ALLOWABLE AMOUNT OF
REVENUES AS SPECIFIED IN SECTION 10-16-1205 (2); AND
(II) FOR ANY YEAR IN WHICH THE ENTERPRISE DID NOT ALLOCATE
THE MAXIMUM ALLOWABLE AMOUNT OF REVENUES TO THE REINSURANCE
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

PROGRAM, ANALYZE:
(A) THE ENTERPRISE'S AND THE DIVISION'S RATIONALE FOR NOT
ALLOCATING THE MAXIMUM ALLOWABLE AMOUNT OF REVENUES TO THE
REINSURANCE PROGRAM; AND
(B) THE IMPACT OF THAT DECISION ON THE AFFORDABILITY RELIEF
PROVIDED TO CONSUMERS IN THE INDIVIDUAL MARKET AND THE ABILITY OF
THE ENTERPRISE TO FUND OTHER PROGRAMS AUTHORIZED IN THIS PART 12;
(d) DETERMINE WHETHER THE ENTERPRISE'S CURRENT AND
PROJECTED REVENUES ARE SUFFICIENT FOR THE ENTERPRISE TO EFFICIENTLY
AND EFFECTIVELY FULFILL ITS DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES AS SPECIFIED
IN THIS PART 12; AND
(e) DETERMINE THE SIGNIFICANCE OF FEDERAL FUNDING ON THE
ABILITY OF THE ENTERPRISE TO EFFICIENTLY AND EFFECTIVELY FULFILL ITS
DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES AS SPECIFIED IN THIS PART 12.
(2) UPON COMPLETION OF THE PERFORMANCE AUDIT REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE AUDITOR SHALL SUBMIT A
WRITTEN REPORT ABOUT THE PERFORMANCE AUDIT TO THE LEGISLATIVE
AUDIT COMMITTEE AND TO THE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEES
OF THE SENATE AND THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.
(3) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE DECEMBER 31, 2028.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-36-401 as added by
House Bill 25B-1004, amend (2) as follows:
24-36-401. Legislative declaration - tax preference performance
statement. (2) (a) In accordance with section 39-21-304 (1), which
requires each bill that creates a new tax expenditure to include a tax
preference performance statement as part of a statutory legislative
declaration, the general assembly further finds and declares that the general
purposes of the tax credits provided for in this part 4 are to induce certain
designated behavior by taxpayers and provide a reduction in insurance
premium tax liability for certain businesses. Specifically, this tax
expenditure is intended to induce insurance companies to purchase tax
credits that will reduce their future insurance premium tax liability in order
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

to generate money for the HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND
CREATED IN SECTION 10-16-1206 (1) AND THE general fund.
(b) The general assembly and the state auditor shall measure the
effectiveness of the tax credits in achieving the purposes specified in
subsection (2)(a) of this section based on the number and value of the
credits claimed and the total amount of general fund money generated FOR
THE HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND AND THE GENERAL
FUND. The division of insurance shall provide the state auditor with
information regarding the total amount of credits claimed and the general
fund AMOUNT OF money generated FOR THE HEALTH INSURANCE
AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND AND THE GENERAL FUND.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-36-402 as added by
House Bill 25B-1004, amend (6) as follows:
24-36-402. Definitions. As used in this part 4, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(6) "Tax credit sale proceeds" or "sale proceeds" means the money
or other liquid asset acceptable to the state treasurer that a qualified
taxpayer pays to the department that is deposited in the tax credit sale
proceeds cash fund created in section 24-36-405 (1) AS SPECIFIED IN
SECTION 24-36-406.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-36-403 as added by
House Bill 25B-1004, amend (2)(a)(I) and (8) as follows:
24-36-403. Insurance premium tax credits - purchase -
authorization to issue - terms - report. (2) (a) (I) (A) The department is
authorized to issue tax credit certificates to qualified taxpayers pursuant to
this part 4 and part 5 of this article 36 equal to the lesser of a total face
value of up to one hundred twenty-five million dollars or total sales
proceeds of up to one hundred million dollars, plus any reasonable and
necessary administrative, monitoring, and closing costs.
(B) IN ADDITION TO THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES AUTHORIZED IN
SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I)(A) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT IS AUTHORIZED
TO ISSUE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES TO QUALIFIED TAXPAYERS PURSUANT TO
THIS PART 4 AND PART 5 OF THIS ARTICLE 36 EQUAL TO THE LESSER OF A
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

TOTAL FACE VALUE OF UP TO ONE HUNDRED TWENTY-FIVE MILLION DOLLARS
OR TOTAL SALE PROCEEDS OF UP TO ONE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS PLUS
ANY REASONABLE AND NECESSARY ADMINISTRATIVE, MONITORING, AND
CLOSING COSTS. THIS SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I) TAKES EFFECT ON JANUARY 1,
2026, ONLY IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN SECTION 10-16-1209 (1) OCCURS.
(8) The tax credit sale proceeds provided by a qualified taxpayer in
return for a tax credit certificate must be deposited in the tax credit sale
proceeds cash fund created in section 24-36-405 (1) AS SPECIFIED IN
SECTION 24-36-406.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend as added by
House Bill 25B-1004 24-36-406 as follows:
24-36-406. Distribution of sale proceeds. (1) EXCEPT AS
PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION, each month, the state
treasurer shall credit the money generated by the sale proceeds pursuant to
parts 4 and 5 of this article 36 to the tax credit sale proceeds cash fund. The
department shall transfer the money to the general fund less any amounts
used for the expenses described in section 24-36-405 (4).
(2) (a) EACH MONTH, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT THE
MONEY GENERATED BY THE SALE PROCEEDS PURSUANT TO PARTS 4 AND 5 OF
THIS ARTICLE 36 AS FOLLOWS:
(I) AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE MONTHLY EXPENSES DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 24-36-405 (4) TO THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS CASH FUND;
(II) THE REMAINDER TO THE HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY
CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 10-16-1206 (1); EXCEPT THAT THE AMOUNT
CREDITED TO THE HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND SHALL
NOT EXCEED ONE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS; AND
(III) AFTER THE AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a)(II) OF THIS
SECTION HAS BEEN CREDITED TO THE HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY
CASH FUND, THEN THE REMAINDER TO THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS CASH
FUND.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TRANSFER THE MONEY IN THE TAX
CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS CASH FUND, LESS ANY AMOUNTS USED FOR THE
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

EXPENSES DESCRIBED IN SECTION 24-36-405 (4), TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(c) (I) THIS SUBSECTION (2) WILL TAKE EFFECT ONLY IF, BY
DECEMBER 31, 2025, THE UNITED STATES CONGRESS DOES NOT ENACT AND
THE PRESIDENT DOES NOT SIGN FEDERAL LEGISLATION THAT EXTENDS,
RECREATES, OR OTHERWISE REINSTATES THE ENHANCED PREMIUM TAX
CREDIT FOR THE 2026 PLAN YEAR. THE COMMISSIONER OF INSURANCE SHALL
NOTIFY THE REVISOR OF STATUTES IN WRITING IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED
IN THIS SUBSECTION (2)(c)(I) HAS OCCURRED BY EMAILING THE NOTICE TO
REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (2)(c)(I) OCCURS, THIS SUBSECTION (2) TAKES EFFECT ON
JANUARY 1, 2026.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (2) WILL BE REPEALED IF, ON OR BEFORE
DECEMBER 31, 2025, THE UNITED STATES CONGRESS ENACTS AND THE
PRESIDENT SIGNS FEDERAL LEGISLATION THAT EXTENDS, RECREATES, OR
OTHERWISE REINSTATES THE ENHANCED PREMIUM TAX CREDIT FOR THE 2026
PLAN YEAR WITH AT LEAST THE SAME ELIGIBILITY AND IN THE SAME AMOUNT
AS AUTHORIZED BY THE AMENDMENTS TO THE PREMIUM TAX CREDIT IN THE
FEDERAL "AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN ACT OF 2021", PUB.L. 117-2, AND THE
FEDERAL "INFLATION REDUCTION ACT OF 2022", PUB.L. 117-169, 136 STAT.
1818 (2022). THE COMMISSIONER OF INSURANCE SHALL NOTIFY THE REVISOR
OF STATUTES IN WRITING IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION
(2)(c)(II) HAS OCCURRED AND OF THE DATE ON WHICH THE CONDITION
O C C U R R E D B Y E M A I L I N G T H E N O T I C E T O
REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. THIS SUBSECTION (2) IS REPEALED
UPON THE DATE IDENTIFIED IN THE NOTICE THAT THE CONDITION SPECIFIED
IN THIS SUBSECTION (2)(c)(II) OCCURRED OR, IF THE NOTICE DOES NOT
SPECIFY THAT DATE, UPON THE DATE OF THE NOTICE TO THE REVISOR OF
STATUTES.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-36-501 as added
by House Bill 25B-1004, amend (2) as follows:
24-36-501. Legislative declaration - tax preference performance
statement. (2) (a) In accordance with section 39-21-304 (1), which
requires each bill that creates a new tax expenditure to include a tax
preference performance statement as part of a statutory legislative
declaration, the general assembly further finds and declares that the general
purposes of the tax credits provided for in this part 5 are to induce certain
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

designated behavior by taxpayers and provide a reduction in income tax
liability for certain businesses. Specifically, this tax expenditure is intended
to induce C corporations to purchase tax credits that will reduce their future
income tax liability in order to generate money for THE HEALTH INSURANCE
AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 10-16-1206 (1) AND the
general fund.
(b) The general assembly and the state auditor shall measure the
effectiveness of the tax credits in achieving the purposes specified in
subsection (2)(a) of this section based on the number and value of the
credits claimed and the total amount of general fund money generated FOR
THE HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND AND THE GENERAL
FUND. The department of revenue shall provide the state auditor with
information regarding the total amount of credits claimed and the general
fund AMOUNT OF money generated FOR THE HEALTH INSURANCE
AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND AND THE GENERAL FUND.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-36-502 as added
by House Bill 25B-1004, amend (6) as follows:
24-36-502. Definitions. As used in this part 5, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(6) "Tax credit sale proceeds" or "sale proceeds" means the money
or other liquid asset acceptable to the state treasurer that a qualified
taxpayer pays to the department that is deposited in the tax credit sale
proceeds cash fund created in section 24-36-405 (1) AS SPECIFIED IN
SECTION 24-36-406.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-36-503 as added
by House Bill 25B-1004, amend (2)(a) and (8) as follows:
24-36-503. Corporate tax credits - purchase - authorization to
issue - terms - report. (2) (a) (I) The department is authorized to issue tax
credit certificates to qualified taxpayers pursuant to this part 5 and part 4 of
this article 36 equal to the lesser of a total face value of up to one hundred
twenty-five million dollars or total sales proceeds of up to one hundred
million dollars, plus any reasonable and necessary administrative,
monitoring, and closing costs.
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

(II) (A) IN ADDITION TO THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES AUTHORIZED
IN SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT IS AUTHORIZED
TO ISSUE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES TO QUALIFIED TAXPAYERS PURSUANT TO
THIS PART 5 AND PART 4 OF THIS ARTICLE 36 EQUAL TO THE LESSER OF A
TOTAL FACE VALUE OF UP TO ONE HUNDRED TWENTY-FIVE MILLION DOLLARS
OR TOTAL SALE PROCEEDS OF UP TO ONE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS PLUS
ANY REASONABLE AND NECESSARY ADMINISTRATIVE, MONITORING, AND
CLOSING COSTS.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(a)(II) TAKES EFFECT ON JANUARY 1, 2026,
ONLY IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN SECTION 10-16-1209 (1) OCCURS.
(8) The tax credit sale proceeds provided by a qualified taxpayer in
return for a tax credit certificate must be deposited in the tax credit sale
proceeds cash fund created in section 24-36-405 (1) AS SPECIFIED IN
SECTION 24-36-406.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add parts 4 and 5 to
article 36 of title 24 as follows:
PART 4
SALE OF INSURANCE PREMIUM TAX CREDITS
24-36-401. Legislative declaration - tax preference performance
statement. (1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) THE INSURANCE PREMIUM TAX CREDITS AUTHORIZED BY THIS
PART 4 ARE NOT REFUNDABLE AND DO NOT IMPOSE AN OBLIGATION OF
PAYMENT IN ANY FUTURE YEAR ON THE STATE;
(b) THE USE OF PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF INSURANCE PREMIUM
TAX CREDITS DOES NOT REQUIRE THE STATE TO BORROW MONEY, EXTEND OR
PLEDGE THE STATE'S CREDIT, OR OBLIGATE THE STATE TO MAKE FUTURE
PAYMENTS FROM STATE REVENUE;
(c) THE SALE AND USE OF THE TAX CREDITS SHALL NOT BE DEEMED
OR CONSTRUED AS CREATING INDEBTEDNESS OR ANY OTHER FINANCIAL
OBLIGATION WHATSOEVER WITHIN THE MEANING OF ANY PROVISION OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION OR THE LAWS OF THE STATE CONCERNING OR LIMITING
THE CREATION OF INDEBTEDNESS OR OTHER FINANCIAL OBLIGATION BY THE
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

STATE;
(d) THE TAX CREDITS ALLOW AN INSURANCE COMPANY WITH AN
INSURANCE PREMIUM TAX LIABILITY TO PREPAY ITS TAX LIABILITY FOR
FUTURE YEARS, WHICH DOES NOT CONSTITUTE A TAX POLICY CHANGE UNDER
SECTION 20 (4)(a) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION; AND
(e) ANY PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF THE TAX CREDITS WILL BE
OFFSET BY DECREASES IN FUTURE REVENUE RESULTING FROM THE BUYER'S
USE OF THE TAX CREDITS AND THEREFORE WILL NOT CAUSE A NET TAX
REVENUE GAIN UNDER SECTION 20 (4)(a) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION.
(2) (a) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-21-304 (1), WHICH
REQUIRES EACH BILL THAT CREATES A NEW TAX EXPENDITURE TO INCLUDE
A TAX PREFERENCE PERFORMANCE STATEMENT AS PART OF A STATUTORY
LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS AND
DECLARES THAT THE GENERAL PURPOSES OF THE TAX CREDITS PROVIDED FOR
IN THIS PART 4 ARE TO INDUCE CERTAIN DESIGNATED BEHAVIOR BY
TAXPAYERS AND PROVIDE A REDUCTION IN INSURANCE PREMIUM TAX
LIABILITY FOR CERTAIN BUSINESSES. SPECIFICALLY, THIS TAX EXPENDITURE
IS INTENDED TO INDUCE INSURANCE COMPANIES TO PURCHASE TAX CREDITS
THAT WILL REDUCE THEIR FUTURE INSURANCE PREMIUM TAX LIABILITY IN
ORDER TO GENERATE MONEY FOR THE HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY
CASH FUND.
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE STATE AUDITOR SHALL
MEASURE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE TAX CREDITS IN ACHIEVING THE
PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION BASED ON THE
NUMBER AND VALUE OF THE CREDITS CLAIMED AND THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF
MONEY GENERATED AND ALLOCATED TO THE HEALTH INSURANCE
AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND. THE DIVISION OF INSURANCE SHALL PROVIDE
THE STATE AUDITOR WITH INFORMATION REGARDING THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF
CREDITS CLAIMED AND THE MONEY ALLOCATED TO THE HEALTH INSURANCE
AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND.
24-36-402. Definitions. AS USED IN THIS PART 4, UNLESS THE
CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(1) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY.
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

(2) "DIVISION OF INSURANCE" MEANS THE DIVISION OF INSURANCE
IN THE DEPARTMENT OF REGULATORY AGENCIES CREATED IN SECTION
10-1-103.
(3) "HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND" MEANS THE
HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
10-16-1206 (1).
(4) "PREMIUM TAX LIABILITY" MEANS THE LIABILITY IMPOSED BY
SECTION 10-3-209 OR 10-6-128, OR, IN THE CASE OF A REPEAL OR REDUCTION
BY THE STATE OF THE LIABILITY IMPOSED BY SECTION 10-3-209 OR 10-6-128,
ANY OTHER TAX LIABILITY IMPOSED UPON AN INSURANCE COMPANY BY THE
STATE.
(5) "QUALIFIED TAXPAYER" MEANS AN INSURANCE COMPANY
AUTHORIZED TO DO BUSINESS IN COLORADO THAT HAS PREMIUM TAX
LIABILITY OWING TO THE STATE AND THAT PURCHASES A TAX CREDIT UNDER
THIS PART 4. "QUALIFIED TAXPAYER" ALSO INCLUDES AN INSURANCE
COMPANY THAT RECEIVES OR ASSUMES A TAX CREDIT TRANSFERRED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-36-403 (7)(e) OR 24-36-404 (5).
(6) "TAX CREDIT" MEANS THE TAX CREDIT CREATED IN SECTION
24-36-403.
(7) "TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS" OR "SALE PROCEEDS" MEANS THE
MONEY OR OTHER LIQUID ASSET ACCEPTABLE TO THE STATE TREASURER
THAT A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER PAYS TO THE DEPARTMENT THAT IS DEPOSITED
AS SPECIFIED IN SECTION 24-36-406.
24-36-403. Insurance premium tax credits - purchase -
authorization to issue - terms - report. (1) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY
PURCHASE INSURANCE PREMIUM TAX CREDITS FROM THE DEPARTMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION AND MAY APPLY THE TAX CREDITS
AGAINST ITS PREMIUM TAX LIABILITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
24-36-404.
(2) (a) THE DEPARTMENT IS AUTHORIZED TO ISSUE TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES TO QUALIFIED TAXPAYERS PURSUANT TO THIS PART 4 AND
PART 5 OF THIS ARTICLE 36 EQUAL TO THE LESSER OF A TOTAL FACE VALUE
OF UP TO ONE HUNDRED TWENTY-FIVE MILLION DOLLARS OR TOTAL SALE
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

PROCEEDS OF UP TO ONE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS PLUS ANY REASONABLE
AND NECESSARY ADMINISTRATIVE, MONITORING, AND CLOSING COSTS.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH AN INDEPENDENT THIRD
PARTY TO CONDUCT OR CONSULT ON A BIDDING PROCESS AMONG QUALIFIED
TAXPAYERS TO PURCHASE THE TAX CREDITS.
(c) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT WITH INSURANCE COMPANIES
IN ADVANCE OF ISSUING ANY TAX CREDITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION.
(3) AN INSURANCE COMPANY AUTHORIZED TO DO BUSINESS IN
COLORADO SEEKING TO PURCHASE TAX CREDITS MUST APPLY TO THE
DEPARTMENT IN THE MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(4) USING PROCEDURES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF
APPLICABLE, BY AN INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY, EACH INSURANCE COMPANY
THAT SUBMITS AN APPLICATION SHALL MAKE A TIMELY AND IRREVOCABLE
OFFER, CONTINGENT ONLY ON THE DEPARTMENT'S ISSUANCE TO THE
INSURANCE COMPANY OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES, TO MAKE A
SPECIFIED PURCHASE PAYMENT AMOUNT TO THE DEPARTMENT ON DATES
SPECIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT, WHICH MUST NOT BURDEN ANY SINGLE TAX
YEAR. THE OFFER MUST INCLUDE:
(a) THE REQUESTED AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS, WHICH MUST NOT BE
LESS THAN ANY MINIMUM AMOUNT ESTABLISHED IN PROCEDURES BY THE
DEPARTMENT OR, IF APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY;
(b) THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S PROPOSED TAX CREDIT PURCHASE
AMOUNT FOR EACH TAX CREDIT DOLLAR REQUESTED. THE MINIMUM
PROPOSED TAX CREDIT PURCHASE AMOUNT MUST BE THE GREATER OF
EITHER:
(I) THE PERCENTAGE OF THE REQUESTED DOLLAR AMOUNT OF TAX
CREDITS THAT THE DEPARTMENT AND, IF APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT
THIRD PARTY DETERMINES TO BE CONSISTENT WITH MARKET CONDITIONS AS
OF THE OFFER DATE; OR
(II) EIGHTY PERCENT OF THE REQUESTED DOLLAR AMOUNT OF TAX
CREDITS; AND
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

(c) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF APPLICABLE,
THE INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY REQUIRES.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO EACH
INSURANCE COMPANY THAT SUBMITS AN APPLICATION INDICATING WHETHER
THE INSURANCE COMPANY HAS BEEN APPROVED AS A PURCHASER OF TAX
CREDITS AND, IF SO, THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS ALLOCATED AND THE
DATE BY WHICH PAYMENT OF THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS MUST BE
MADE.
(6) ON RECEIPT OF PAYMENT OF THE SALE PROCEEDS, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE TO EACH QUALIFIED TAXPAYER A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE. THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE MUST STATE:
(a) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF PREMIUM TAX CREDITS THAT THE
QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM;
(b) THE AMOUNT THAT THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER HAS PAID OR
AGREED TO PAY IN RETURN FOR THE ISSUANCE OF THE TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES AND THE DATE OF THE PAYMENT;
(c) THE DATES ON WHICH THE TAX CREDITS WILL BE AVAILABLE FOR
USE BY THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER;
(d) ANY PENALTIES OR OTHER REMEDIES FOR NONCOMPLIANCE;
(e) THE PROCEDURES TO BE USED FOR TRANSFERRING OR ASSUMING
THE TAX CREDITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (7)(e) OF THIS SECTION
OR SECTION 24-36-404 (5);
(f) THE SERIAL NUMBER OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE; AND
(g) ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE
DEPARTMENT AS A CONDITION OF ISSUING THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE.
(7) (a) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT ISSUE A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE TO ANY QUALIFIED TAXPAYER THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE THE TAX
CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME THE DEPARTMENT SPECIFIES.
(b) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE THE TAX CREDIT
PAGE 19-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME THE DEPARTMENT SPECIFIES IS SUBJECT TO
A PENALTY EQUAL TO TEN PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT OF THE PURCHASE PRICE
THAT REMAINS UNPAID. THE PENALTY MUST BE PAID TO THE DEPARTMENT
WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER DEMAND.
(c) THE DEPARTMENT MAY OFFER TO REALLOCATE THE DEFAULTED
TAX CREDITS AMONG OTHER QUALIFIED TAXPAYERS, SO THAT THE RESULT
AFTER REALLOCATION IS THE SAME AS IF THE INITIAL ALLOCATION HAD BEEN
PERFORMED WITHOUT CONSIDERING THE TAX CREDIT ALLOCATION TO THE
DEFAULTING QUALIFIED TAXPAYER.
(d) IF THE REALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS UNDER SUBSECTION (7)(c)
OF THIS SECTION RESULTS IN THE PAYMENT BY ANOTHER QUALIFIED
TAXPAYER OF THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS NOT PAID BY THE
DEFAULTING QUALIFIED TAXPAYER, THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE THE
PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (7)(b) OF THIS SECTION.
(e) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER THAT FAILS TO PAY THE TAX CREDIT
SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME SPECIFIED MAY AVOID THE IMPOSITION OF
THE PENALTY BY TRANSFERRING THE ALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS TO A NEW
OR EXISTING QUALIFIED TAXPAYER WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE DUE
DATE OF THE DEFAULTED INSTALLMENT. ANY TRANSFEREE OF AN
ALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS OF A DEFAULTING QUALIFIED TAXPAYER
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (7) SHALL AGREE TO PAY THE TAX CREDIT SALE
PROCEEDS WITHIN FIVE DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF THE TRANSFER.
(8) THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS PROVIDED BY A QUALIFIED
TAXPAYER IN RETURN FOR A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION MUST BE DEPOSITED AS SPECIFIED IN
SECTION 24-36-406.
(9) (a) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE, WITHIN THIRTY DAYS
AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE FISCAL YEAR, A DATA FILE TO THE DIVISION OF
INSURANCE AND THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR IN
WHICH IT ISSUES TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES PURSUANT TO THIS PART 4. THE
DATA FILE MUST INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAME AND IDENTIFYING NUMBER ISSUED BY THE NATIONAL
ASSOCIATION OF INSURANCE COMMISSIONERS, OR ANY SUCCESSOR
ORGANIZATION, OF EACH QUALIFIED TAXPAYER TO WHICH THE DEPARTMENT
PAGE 20-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

ISSUED A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE;
(II) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT ALLOCATED TO THE
QUALIFIED TAXPAYER; AND
(III) THE SERIAL NUMBER OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED
TO THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN RECORDS OF EACH TAX
CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED, TRANSFERRED, OR ASSUMED THAT ARE
SUFFICIENT TO ALLOW THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE OR THE DIVISION OF
INSURANCE TO VERIFY THE ISSUANCE AND OWNERSHIP OF THE CREDIT. THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE RECORDS TO THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
AUDITOR UPON REQUEST SO THAT THE STATE AUDITOR CAN EVALUATE THE
EFFECTIVENESS OF THE TAX CREDITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTIONS
24-36-401 (2)(b) AND 39-21-305.
(10) THE DEPARTMENT MAY PAY AN INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY AND
ANY CONSULTANTS REASONABLE AND NECESSARY ADMINISTRATIVE,
MONITORING, AND CLOSING COSTS USING THE PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF
TAX CREDITS.
24-36-404. Use of insurance premium tax credits - carry over.
(1) FOR A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED IN FISCAL YEAR 2025-26, THE
DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND
BUDGETING, PRIOR TO THE SALE, SHALL DETERMINE THE CALENDAR YEARS
IN WHICH THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S
TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S PREMIUM TAX LIABILITY.
(2) THE TOTAL CREDIT TO BE APPLIED BY A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER IN
ANY ONE YEAR MUST NOT EXCEED THE PREMIUM TAX LIABILITY OF THE
QUALIFIED TAXPAYER FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR. IF THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER
CANNOT USE THE ENTIRE AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT FOR THE TAXABLE
YEAR IN WHICH THE TAXPAYER IS ELIGIBLE FOR THE CREDIT, THE EXCESS
MAY BE CARRIED OVER TO SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEARS AND USED AS A
CREDIT AGAINST THE PREMIUM TAX LIABILITY OF THE TAXPAYER FOR THOSE
TAXABLE YEARS; EXCEPT THAT THE CREDIT MAY NOT BE CARRIED OVER TO
ANY TAXABLE YEAR THAT BEGINS AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2033. ANY AMOUNT
OF THE CREDIT THAT IS NOT TIMELY CLAIMED EXPIRES AND IS NOT
REFUNDABLE.
PAGE 21-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

(3) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER CLAIMING A CREDIT UNDER THIS PART 4
SHALL SUBMIT THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE WITH ITS TAX RETURN.
(4) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER CLAIMING A TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS
PART 4 SHALL NOT BE REQUIRED TO PAY ANY ADDITIONAL OR RETALIATORY
TAX AS A RESULT OF CLAIMING THE CREDIT.
(5) IF A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER HOLDING AN UNCLAIMED TAX CREDIT
IS PART OF A MERGER, ACQUISITION, OR LINE OF BUSINESS DIVESTITURE
TRANSACTION, THE TAX CREDIT MAY BE TRANSFERRED TO AND ASSUMED BY
THE RESULTING ENTITY IF THE RESULTING ENTITY IS AN INSURANCE
COMPANY AUTHORIZED TO DO BUSINESS IN COLORADO THAT HAS PREMIUM
TAX LIABILITY. THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER THAT ORIGINALLY PURCHASED
THE CREDIT AND THE RESULTING ENTITY SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT IN
WRITING OF THE TRANSFER OR ASSUMPTION OF THE CREDIT IN ACCORDANCE
WITH PROCEDURES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT. THE TRANSFER OR
ASSUMPTION OF THE TAX CREDIT DOES NOT AFFECT THE TIME SCHEDULE FOR
CLAIMING THE TAX CREDIT AS PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION.
(6) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE A REPORT TO THE DIVISION OF
INSURANCE FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH IT ISSUES TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES PURSUANT TO THIS PART 4 WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE
CLOSE OF THE FISCAL YEAR. THE REPORT MUST INCLUDE:
(a) THE NAME AND IDENTIFYING NUMBER ISSUED BY THE NATIONAL
ASSOCIATION OF INSURANCE COMMISSIONERS, OR ANY SUCCESSOR
ORGANIZATION, OF EACH QUALIFIED TAXPAYER TO WHICH THE DEPARTMENT
ISSUED A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE;
(b) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT ALLOCATED TO THE
QUALIFIED TAXPAYER; AND
(c) THE SERIAL NUMBER OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED,
TRANSFERRED, OR ASSUMED THAT IS SUFFICIENT TO ALLOW THE DIVISION OF
INSURANCE TO VERIFY THE ISSUANCE AND OWNERSHIP OF THE TAX CREDIT.
24-36-405. Tax credit sale proceeds cash fund - creation. (1) THE
TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS CASH FUND IS CREATED IN THE STATE
TREASURY. THE FUND CONSISTS OF MONEY GENERATED BY SALE PROCEEDS
CREDITED TO THE FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-36-406 AND ANY OTHER
PAGE 22-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

MONEY THAT THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER TO
THE FUND.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND INCOME
DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE TAX CREDIT
SALE PROCEEDS CASH FUND TO THE FUND.
(3) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER ANY UNEXPENDED AND
UNENCUMBERED MONEY REMAINING IN THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS
CASH FUND AT THE END OF A FISCAL YEAR TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(4) (a) SUBJECT TO ANNUAL APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, THE DEPARTMENT MAY EXPEND MONEY FROM THE FUND FOR ANY
REASONABLE AND NECESSARY ADMINISTRATIVE, MONITORING, AND CLOSING
COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH IMPLEMENTING AND ADMINISTERING PARTS 4 AND
5 OF THIS ARTICLE 36.
(b) SUBJECT TO ANNUAL APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE MAY EXPEND MONEY FROM THE
FUND FOR DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH IMPLEMENTING
AND ADMINISTERING PARTS 4 AND 5 OF THIS ARTICLE 36.
24-36-406. Distribution of sale proceeds. (1) EACH MONTH, THE
STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY GENERATED BY THE SALE
PROCEEDS PURSUANT TO PARTS 4 AND 5 OF THIS ARTICLE 36 AS FOLLOWS:
(a) AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE MONTHLY EXPENSES DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 24-36-405 (4) TO THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS CASH FUND;
(b) THE REMAINDER TO THE HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY
CASH FUND; EXCEPT THAT THE AMOUNT CREDITED TO THE HEALTH
INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND SHALL NOT EXCEED ONE HUNDRED
MILLION DOLLARS; AND
(c) AFTER THE AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF THIS
SECTION HAS BEEN CREDITED TO THE HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY
CASH FUND, THEN THE REMAINDER TO THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS CASH
FUND.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TRANSFER THE MONEY IN THE TAX
PAGE 23-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS CASH FUND, LESS ANY AMOUNTS USED FOR THE
EXPENSES DESCRIBED IN SECTION 24-36-405 (4), TO THE GENERAL FUND.
24-36-407. Part contingent on condition - repeal of part - notice
to the revisor. (1) THIS PART 4 WILL TAKE EFFECT ONLY IF, BY DECEMBER
31, 2025, THE UNITED STATES CONGRESS DOES NOT ENACT AND THE
PRESIDENT DOES NOT SIGN FEDERAL LEGISLATION THAT EXTENDS,
RECREATES, OR OTHERWISE REINSTATES THE ENHANCED PREMIUM TAX
CREDIT FOR THE 2026 PLAN YEAR. THE COMMISSIONER OF INSURANCE SHALL
NOTIFY THE REVISOR OF STATUTES IN WRITING IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED
IN THIS SUBSECTION (1) HAS OCCURRED BY EMAILING THE NOTICE TO
REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (1) OCCURS, THIS PART 4 TAKES EFFECT ON JANUARY 1, 2026.
(2) THIS PART 4 WILL BE REPEALED IF, ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31,
2025, THE UNITED STATES CONGRESS ENACTS AND THE PRESIDENT SIGNS
FEDERAL LEGISLATION THAT EXTENDS, RECREATES, OR OTHERWISE
REINSTATES THE ENHANCED PREMIUM TAX CREDIT FOR THE 2026 PLAN YEAR
WITH AT LEAST THE SAME ELIGIBILITY AND IN THE SAME AMOUNT AS
AUTHORIZED BY THE AMENDMENTS TO THE PREMIUM TAX CREDIT IN THE
FEDERAL "AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN ACT OF 2021", PUB.L. 117-2, AND THE
FEDERAL "INFLATION REDUCTION ACT OF 2022", PUB.L. 117-169, 136 STAT.
1818 (2022). THE COMMISSIONER OF INSURANCE SHALL NOTIFY THE REVISOR
OF STATUTES IN WRITING IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION
(2) HAS OCCURRED AND OF THE DATE ON WHICH THE CONDITION OCCURRED
BY EMAILING THE NOTICE TO REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. THIS
PART 4 IS REPEALED UPON THE DATE IDENTIFIED IN THE NOTICE THAT THE
CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION (2) OCCURRED OR, IF THE NOTICE
DOES NOT SPECIFY THAT DATE, UPON THE DATE OF THE NOTICE TO THE
REVISOR OF STATUTES.
(3) THIS PART 4 IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE DECEMBER 31, 2040.
PART 5
SALE OF CORPORATE TAX CREDITS
24-36-501. Legislative declaration - tax preference performance
statement. (1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) THE CORPORATE TAX CREDITS AUTHORIZED BY THIS PART 5 ARE
PAGE 24-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

NOT REFUNDABLE AND DO NOT IMPOSE AN OBLIGATION OF PAYMENT IN ANY
FUTURE YEAR ON THE STATE;
(b) THE USE OF PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF CORPORATE TAX
CREDITS DOES NOT REQUIRE THE STATE TO BORROW MONEY, EXTEND OR
PLEDGE THE STATE'S CREDIT, OR OBLIGATE THE STATE TO MAKE FUTURE
PAYMENTS FROM STATE REVENUE;
(c) THE SALE AND USE OF THE CORPORATE TAX CREDITS SHALL NOT
BE DEEMED OR CONSTRUED AS CREATING INDEBTEDNESS OR ANY OTHER
FINANCIAL OBLIGATION WHATSOEVER WITHIN THE MEANING OF ANY
PROVISION OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION OR THE LAWS OF THE STATE
CONCERNING OR LIMITING THE CREATION OF INDEBTEDNESS OR OTHER
FINANCIAL OBLIGATION BY THE STATE;
(d) THE TAX CREDITS ALLOW A CORPORATION WITH AN INCOME TAX
LIABILITY TO PREPAY ITS TAX LIABILITY FOR FUTURE YEARS, WHICH DOES
NOT CONSTITUTE A TAX POLICY CHANGE UNDER SECTION 20 (4)(a) OF
ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION; AND
(e) ANY PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF THE TAX CREDITS WILL BE
OFFSET BY DECREASES IN FUTURE REVENUE RESULTING FROM THE BUYER'S
USE OF THE TAX CREDITS AND THEREFORE WILL NOT CAUSE A NET TAX
REVENUE GAIN UNDER SECTION 20 (4)(a) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION.
(2) (a) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-21-304 (1), WHICH
REQUIRES EACH BILL THAT CREATES A NEW TAX EXPENDITURE TO INCLUDE
A TAX PREFERENCE PERFORMANCE STATEMENT AS PART OF A STATUTORY
LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS AND
DECLARES THAT THE GENERAL PURPOSES OF THE TAX CREDITS PROVIDED FOR
IN THIS PART 5 ARE TO INDUCE CERTAIN DESIGNATED BEHAVIOR BY
TAXPAYERS AND PROVIDE A REDUCTION IN INCOME TAX LIABILITY FOR
CERTAIN BUSINESSES. SPECIFICALLY, THIS TAX EXPENDITURE IS INTENDED
TO INDUCE C CORPORATIONS TO PURCHASE TAX CREDITS THAT WILL REDUCE
THEIR FUTURE INCOME TAX LIABILITY IN ORDER TO GENERATE MONEY FOR
THE HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND.
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE STATE AUDITOR SHALL
MEASURE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE TAX CREDITS IN ACHIEVING THE
PAGE 25-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION BASED ON THE
NUMBER AND VALUE OF THE CREDITS CLAIMED AND THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF
MONEY GENERATED AND ALLOCATED TO THE HEALTH INSURANCE
AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND. THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL PROVIDE
THE STATE AUDITOR WITH INFORMATION REGARDING THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF
CREDITS CLAIMED AND THE MONEY ALLOCATED TO THE HEALTH INSURANCE
AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND.
24-36-502. Definitions. AS USED IN THIS PART 5, UNLESS THE
CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(1) "C CORPORATION" HAS THE SAME MEANING AS IN SECTION
39-22-103 (2.5).
(2) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY.
(3) "HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND" MEANS THE
HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
10-16-1206 (1).
(4) "INCOME TAX LIABILITY" MEANS THE LIABILITY IMPOSED BY
SECTION 39-22-301.
(5) "QUALIFIED TAXPAYER" MEANS A C CORPORATION AUTHORIZED
TO DO BUSINESS IN COLORADO THAT HAS OR WILL HAVE AN INCOME TAX
LIABILITY OWING TO THE STATE. "QUALIFIED TAXPAYER" ALSO INCLUDES A
C CORPORATION THAT RECEIVES OR ASSUMES A TAX CREDIT TRANSFERRED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 26-36-503 (7)(e).
(6) "TAX CREDIT" MEANS THE TAX CREDIT CREATED IN SECTION
24-36-503.
(7) "TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS" OR "SALE PROCEEDS" MEANS THE
MONEY OR OTHER LIQUID ASSET ACCEPTABLE TO THE STATE TREASURER
THAT A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER PAYS TO THE DEPARTMENT THAT IS CREDITED
AS SPECIFIED IN SECTION 24-36-406.
24-36-503. Corporate tax credits - purchase - authorization to
issue - terms - report. (1) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY PURCHASE INCOME
TAX CREDITS FROM THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION
PAGE 26-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

AND MAY APPLY THE TAX CREDITS AGAINST ITS INCOME TAX LIABILITY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-36-504.
(2) (a) THE DEPARTMENT IS AUTHORIZED TO ISSUE TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES TO QUALIFIED TAXPAYERS PURSUANT TO THIS PART 5 AND
PART 4 OF THIS ARTICLE 36 EQUAL TO THE LESSER OF A TOTAL FACE VALUE
OF UP TO ONE HUNDRED TWENTY-FIVE MILLION DOLLARS OR TOTAL SALES
PROCEEDS OF UP TO ONE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS PLUS ANY REASONABLE
AND NECESSARY ADMINISTRATIVE, MONITORING, AND CLOSING COSTS.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH AN INDEPENDENT THIRD
PARTY TO CONDUCT OR CONSULT ON A BIDDING PROCESS AMONG QUALIFIED
TAXPAYERS TO PURCHASE THE TAX CREDITS.
(c) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT WITH C CORPORATIONS IN
ADVANCE OF ISSUING ANY TAX CREDITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(3) A C CORPORATION AUTHORIZED TO DO BUSINESS IN COLORADO
SEEKING TO PURCHASE TAX CREDITS MUST APPLY TO THE DEPARTMENT IN
THE MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(4) USING PROCEDURES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF
APPLICABLE, BY AN INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY, EACH C CORPORATION THAT
SUBMITS AN APPLICATION SHALL MAKE A TIMELY AND IRREVOCABLE OFFER,
CONTINGENT ONLY ON THE DEPARTMENT'S ISSUANCE TO THE C
CORPORATION OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES, TO MAKE A SPECIFIED
PURCHASE PAYMENT AMOUNT TO THE DEPARTMENT ON DATES SPECIFIED BY
THE DEPARTMENT, WHICH MUST NOT BURDEN ANY SINGLE TAX YEAR. THE
OFFER MUST INCLUDE:
(a) THE REQUESTED AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS, WHICH MUST NOT BE
LESS THAN ANY MINIMUM AMOUNT ESTABLISHED IN PROCEDURES BY THE
DEPARTMENT OR, IF APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY;
(b) THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S PROPOSED TAX CREDIT PURCHASE
AMOUNT FOR EACH TAX CREDIT DOLLAR REQUESTED. THE MINIMUM
PROPOSED TAX CREDIT PURCHASE AMOUNT MUST BE THE GREATER OF
EITHER:
(I) THE PERCENTAGE OF THE REQUESTED DOLLAR AMOUNT OF TAX
PAGE 27-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

CREDITS THAT THE DEPARTMENT AND, IF APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT
THIRD PARTY DETERMINES TO BE CONSISTENT WITH MARKET CONDITIONS AS
OF THE OFFER DATE; OR
(II) EIGHTY PERCENT OF THE REQUESTED DOLLAR AMOUNT OF TAX
CREDITS; AND
(c) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF APPLICABLE,
THE INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY REQUIRES.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO EACH C
CORPORATION THAT SUBMITS AN APPLICATION INDICATING WHETHER THE C
CORPORATION HAS BEEN APPROVED AS A PURCHASER OF TAX CREDITS AND,
IF SO, THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS ALLOCATED AND THE DATE BY WHICH
PAYMENT OF THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS MUST BE MADE.
(6) ON RECEIPT OF PAYMENT OF THE SALE PROCEEDS, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE TO EACH QUALIFIED TAXPAYER A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE. THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE MUST STATE:
(a) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF INCOME TAX CREDITS THAT THE
QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM;
(b) THE AMOUNT THAT THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER HAS PAID FOR THE
ISSUANCE OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES AND THE DATE OF THE
PAYMENT;
(c) THE DATES ON WHICH THE TAX CREDITS WILL BE AVAILABLE FOR
USE BY THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER;
(d) ANY PENALTIES OR OTHER REMEDIES FOR NONCOMPLIANCE;
(e) THE PROCEDURES TO BE USED FOR TRANSFERRING OR ASSUMING
THE TAX CREDITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (7)(e) OF THIS
SECTION;
(f) THE SERIAL NUMBER OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE; AND
(g) ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE
DEPARTMENT AS A CONDITION OF ISSUING THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE.
PAGE 28-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

(7) (a) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT ISSUE A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE TO ANY QUALIFIED TAXPAYER THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE THE TAX
CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME THE DEPARTMENT SPECIFIES.
(b) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE THE TAX CREDIT
SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME THE DEPARTMENT SPECIFIES IS SUBJECT TO
A PENALTY EQUAL TO TEN PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT OF THE PURCHASE PRICE
THAT REMAINS UNPAID. THE PENALTY MUST BE PAID TO THE DEPARTMENT
WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER DEMAND.
(c) THE DEPARTMENT MAY OFFER TO REALLOCATE THE DEFAULTED
TAX CREDITS AMONG OTHER QUALIFIED TAXPAYERS SO THAT THE RESULT
AFTER REALLOCATION IS THE SAME AS IF THE INITIAL ALLOCATION HAD BEEN
PERFORMED WITHOUT CONSIDERING THE TAX CREDIT ALLOCATION TO THE
DEFAULTING QUALIFIED TAXPAYER.
(d) IF THE REALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS UNDER SUBSECTION (7)(c)
OF THIS SECTION RESULTS IN THE PAYMENT BY ANOTHER QUALIFIED
TAXPAYER OF THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS NOT PAID BY THE
DEFAULTING QUALIFIED TAXPAYER, THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE THE
PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (7)(b) OF THIS SECTION.
(e) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER THAT FAILS TO PAY THE TAX CREDIT
SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME SPECIFIED MAY AVOID THE IMPOSITION OF
THE PENALTY BY TRANSFERRING THE ALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS TO A NEW
OR EXISTING QUALIFIED TAXPAYER WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE DUE
DATE OF THE DEFAULTED INSTALLMENT. ANY TRANSFEREE OF AN
ALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS OF A DEFAULTING QUALIFIED TAXPAYER
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (7) SHALL AGREE TO PAY THE TAX CREDIT SALE
PROCEEDS WITHIN FIVE DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF THE TRANSFER.
(8) THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS PROVIDED BY A QUALIFIED
TAXPAYER IN RETURN FOR A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION MUST BE CREDITED AS SPECIFIED IN
SECTION 24-36-406.
(9) (a) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE, WITHIN THIRTY DAYS
AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE FISCAL YEAR, A DATA FILE TO THE DEPARTMENT OF
REVENUE FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH IT ISSUES TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES PURSUANT TO THIS PART 5. THE DATA FILE MUST INCLUDE:
PAGE 29-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

(I) THE NAME AND FEDERAL EMPLOYER IDENTIFICATION NUMBER OF
EACH QUALIFIED TAXPAYER TO WHICH THE DEPARTMENT ISSUED A TAX
CREDIT CERTIFICATE;
(II) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT ALLOCATED TO THE
QUALIFIED TAXPAYER; AND
(III) THE SERIAL NUMBER OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED
TO THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN RECORDS OF EACH TAX
CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED, TRANSFERRED, OR ASSUMED THAT ARE
SUFFICIENT TO ALLOW THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE TO VERIFY THE
ISSUANCE AND OWNERSHIP OF THE CREDIT. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
PROVIDE THE RECORDS TO THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR UPON
REQUEST SO THAT THE STATE AUDITOR CAN EVALUATE THE EFFECTIVENESS
OF THE TAX CREDITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTIONS 24-36-501 (2)(b) AND
39-21-305.
(10) THE DEPARTMENT MAY PAY AN INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY AND
ANY CONSULTANTS REASONABLE AND NECESSARY ADMINISTRATIVE,
MONITORING, AND CLOSING COSTS USING THE PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF
TAX CREDITS.
24-36-504. Use of corporate income tax credits - carry over.
(1) FOR A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED IN FISCAL YEAR 2025-26, THE
DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND
BUDGETING, PRIOR TO THE SALE, SHALL DETERMINE THE TAX YEARS IN
WHICH THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S
TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S INCOME TAX LIABILITY.
(2) FOR THE TAX YEAR SPECIFIED IN THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE
ISSUED PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-34-503 (6), THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER
MAY CLAIM THE AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE QUALIFIED
TAXPAYER'S INCOME TAX LIABILITY. IF THE AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT
EXCEEDS THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S ACTUAL TAX LIABILITY FOR THAT TAX
YEAR, THE EXCESS IS NOT REFUNDED TO THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER. THE
QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY CARRY FORWARD AND APPLY THE UNUSED TAX
CREDIT AGAINST THE INCOME TAX LIABILITY FOR ANY SUCCEEDING TAX
YEAR; EXCEPT THAT THE TAX CREDIT MAY NOT BE CARRIED FORWARD TO A
PAGE 30-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

TAX YEAR THAT BEGINS AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2033. THE TAXPAYER SHALL
APPLY THE CARRY FORWARD CREDIT AGAINST THE INCOME TAX LIABILITY
FOR THE EARLIEST OF THE INCOME TAX YEARS POSSIBLE. ANY AMOUNT OF
THE TAX CREDIT THAT IS NOT USED AFTER THIS PERIOD IS NOT REFUNDABLE.
(3) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER CLAIMING A CREDIT UNDER THIS PART 5
SHALL SUBMIT THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE WITH ITS TAX RETURN.
24-36-505. Part contingent on condition - repeal of part - notice
to the revisor. (1) THIS PART 5 WILL TAKE EFFECT ONLY IF, BY DECEMBER
31, 2025, THE UNITED STATES CONGRESS DOES NOT ENACT AND THE
PRESIDENT DOES NOT SIGN FEDERAL LEGISLATION THAT EXTENDS,
RECREATES, OR OTHERWISE REINSTATES THE ENHANCED PREMIUM TAX
CREDIT FOR THE 2026 PLAN YEAR. THE COMMISSIONER OF INSURANCE SHALL
NOTIFY THE REVISOR OF STATUTES IN WRITING IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED
IN THIS SUBSECTION (1) HAS OCCURRED BY EMAILING THE NOTICE TO
REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (1) OCCURS, THIS PART 5 TAKES EFFECT ON JANUARY 1, 2026.
(2) THIS PART 5 WILL BE REPEALED IF, ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31,
2025, THE UNITED STATES CONGRESS ENACTS AND THE PRESIDENT SIGNS
FEDERAL LEGISLATION THAT EXTENDS, RECREATES, OR OTHERWISE
REINSTATES THE ENHANCED PREMIUM TAX CREDIT FOR THE 2026 PLAN YEAR
WITH AT LEAST THE SAME ELIGIBILITY AND IN THE SAME AMOUNT AS
AUTHORIZED BY THE AMENDMENTS TO THE PREMIUM TAX CREDIT IN THE
FEDERAL "AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN ACT OF 2021", PUB.L. 117-2, AND THE
FEDERAL "INFLATION REDUCTION ACT OF 2022", PUB.L. 117-169, 136 STAT.
1818 (2022). THE COMMISSIONER OF INSURANCE SHALL NOTIFY THE REVISOR
OF STATUTES IN WRITING IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION
(2) HAS OCCURRED AND OF THE DATE ON WHICH THE CONDITION OCCURRED
BY EMAILING THE NOTICE TO REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. THIS
PART 5 IS REPEALED UPON THE DATE IDENTIFIED IN THE NOTICE THAT THE
CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION (2) OCCURRED OR, IF THE NOTICE
DOES NOT SPECIFY THAT DATE, UPON THE DATE OF THE NOTICE TO THE
REVISOR OF STATUTES.
(3) THIS PART 5 IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE DECEMBER 31, 2040.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-201.1, amend
(1)(d)(XXII); repeal (1)(d)(XXIII); and add (1)(d)(XXIV), (1)(d)(XXV),
PAGE 31-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

(1)(d)(XXVI), and (1)(d)(XXVII) as follows:
24-75-201.1. Restriction on state appropriations - legislative
declaration - definitions. (1) (d) For each fiscal year, unrestricted general
fund year-end balances must be retained as a reserve in the following
amounts:
(XXII) For the fiscal year 2021-22, thirteen and four-tenths percent
of the amount appropriated for expenditure from the general fund for that
fiscal year; and
(XXIII) (A) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(1)(d)(XXIII)(B) of this section, for the fiscal year 2022-23 and each fiscal
year thereafter, fifteen percent of the amount appropriated for expenditure
from the general fund for that fiscal year; except that, for the 2023-24 state
fiscal year, the amount retained as a reserve must be fifteen percent of the
amount appropriated for expenditure from the general fund for that fiscal
year plus fifteen percent of the amount of the general fund appropriations
reduced pursuant to section 24-75-226 (4)(a)(I); and for the 2024-25 state
fiscal year, the amount retained as a reserve must be fifteen percent of the
amount appropriated for expenditure from the general fund plus fifty-six
million four hundred ninety-three thousand five hundred forty-three dollars.
(B) For the fiscal year 2023-24 and each fiscal year thereafter until
the escrow money is released as set forth in section 23-40-107, the amount
of the reserve described in subsection (1)(d)(XXIII)(A) of this section for
that fiscal year reduced by forty-one million two hundred fifty thousand
dollars. As used in this subsection (1)(d)(XXIII)(B), "escrow money" has
the same meaning as set forth in section 23-40-107 (2)(c).
(XXIV) FOR THE FISCAL YEAR 2022-23, FIFTEEN PERCENT OF THE
AMOUNT APPROPRIATED FOR EXPENDITURE FROM THE GENERAL FUND FOR
THAT FISCAL YEAR;
(XXV) FOR THE FISCAL YEAR 2023-24, FIFTEEN PERCENT OF THE
AMOUNT APPROPRIATED FOR EXPENDITURE FROM THE GENERAL FUND FOR
THAT FISCAL YEAR:
(A) PLUS FIFTEEN PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT OF THE GENERAL FUND
APPROPRIATIONS REDUCED PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-75-226 (4)(a)(I); AND
PAGE 32-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

(B) SO LONG AS THE ESCROW MONEY IS NOT RELEASED AS SET FORTH
IN SECTION 23-40-107, MINUS FORTY-ONE MILLION TWO HUNDRED FIFTY
THOUSAND DOLLARS. AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (1)(d)(XXV)(B),
"ESCROW MONEY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 23-40-107
(2)(c).
(XXVI) FOR THE FISCAL YEAR 2024-25, FIFTEEN PERCENT OF THE
AMOUNT APPROPRIATED FOR EXPENDITURE FROM THE GENERAL FUND FOR
THAT FISCAL YEAR:
(A) PLUS FIFTY-SIX MILLION FOUR HUNDRED NINETY-THREE
THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED FORTY-THREE DOLLARS; AND
(B) SO LONG AS THE ESCROW MONEY IS NOT RELEASED AS SET FORTH
IN SECTION 23-40-107, MINUS FORTY-ONE MILLION TWO HUNDRED FIFTY
THOUSAND DOLLARS. AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (1)(d)(XXVI)(B),
"ESCROW MONEY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 23-40-107
(2)(c).
(XXVII) FOR THE FISCAL YEAR 2025-26, AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, FIFTEEN PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT APPROPRIATED FOR
EXPENDITURE FROM THE GENERAL FUND FOR THAT FISCAL YEAR MINUS:
(A) THE AMOUNT CALCULATED BY THE STATE TREASURER IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 10-16-1206 (1.5)(a)(II)(B); EXCEPT THAT THIS
SUBSECTION (1)(d)(XXVII)(A) TAKES EFFECT ON JANUARY 1, 2026, ONLY
IF THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN SECTION 10-16-1209 (1) OCCURS; AND
(B) SO LONG AS THE ESCROW MONEY IS NOT RELEASED AS SET FORTH
IN SECTION 23-40-107, FORTY-ONE MILLION TWO HUNDRED FIFTY THOUSAND
DOLLARS. AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (1)(d)(XXVII)(B), "ESCROW
MONEY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 23-40-107 (2)(c).
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-226.5, add
(2)(c)(III) as follows:
24-75-226.5. ARPA refinance state money cash fund - creation
- reduction in general fund appropriations - legislative intent -
definitions - repeal. (2) (c) (III) WITHIN THREE DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE
DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION (2)(c)(III), THE STATE TREASURER SHALL
PAGE 33-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

TRANSFER TEN MILLION DOLLARS FROM THE REFINANCE DISCRETIONARY
ACCOUNT TO THE HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND CREATED
IN SECTION 10-16-1206 (1).
SECTION 16. Appropriation. For the 2025-26 state fiscal year,
$3,173,500 is appropriated to the department of treasury. This appropriation
is from the tax credit sale proceeds cash fund created in section 24-36-405
(1), C.R.S. To implement this act, the department may use this
appropriation for tax credit administration.
SECTION 17. Effective date. (1) Except as otherwise provided in
this section, this act takes effect upon passage.
(2) Section 24-36-401 (2), Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended
in section 6 of this act, section 24-36-402 (6), Colorado Revised Statutes,
as amended in section 7 of this act, 24-36-403 (2)(a)(I) and (8), Colorado
Revised Statutes, as amended in section 8 of this act, section 24-36-406,
Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 9 of this act, section
24-36-501 (2), Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 10 of this
act, section 24-36-502 (6), Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in
section 11 of this act, and section 24-36-503 (2)(a) and (8), Colorado
Revised Statutes, as amended in section 12 of this act, take effect only if
House Bill 25B-1004 becomes law, in which case section 24-36-401 (2),
Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 6 of this act, section
24-36-402 (6), Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 7 of this
act, 24-36-403 (2)(a)(I) and (8), Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in
section 8 of this act, section 24-36-406, Colorado Revised Statutes, as
amended in section 9 of this act, section 24-36-501 (2), Colorado Revised
Statutes, as amended in section 10 of this act, section 24-36-502 (6),
Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 11 of this act, and section
24-36-503 (2)(a) and (8), Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section
12 of this act, take effect one day after the effective date of House Bill
25B-1004.
(3) Parts 4 and 5 of article 36 of title 24, Colorado Revised Statutes,
enacted in section 13 of this act, take effect only if House Bill 25B-1004
does not become law, in which case parts 4 and 5 of article 36 of title 24,
Colorado Revised Statutes, enacted in section 13 of this act, take effect
upon passage.
PAGE 34-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006

SECTION 18. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Connor Randall Esther van Mourik
ACTING CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 35-HOUSE BILL 25B-1006